Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 4 Architects

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to engineers, see chapter 29 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d Architects § 1 et seq.

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Practice of architecture by corporation as affected by license regulation, 56 ALR2d 726.

What amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements, 82 ALR2d 1013.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he was not licensed in the latter state, 32 ALR3d 1151.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Revocation or suspension of license to practice architecture, 58 ALR3d 543.

Right of architect to compensation under contractual provision that fee is to be paid from construction loan funds, 92 ALR3d 509.

Architectural drawings or illustrations as exempt from sales or use tax, 27 ALR5th 794.

Architect's services as within mechanics' lien statute, 31 ALR5th 664.

6 C.J.S. Architects § 1 et seq.

§ 33-4-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Building” means a structure, including all the components which a structure comprises, including structural, mechanical and electrical systems, intended for use as shelter for man and his possessions;

“Practice of architecture” means rendering or offering to render service to clients generally, including any one or any combination of the following practices or professional services; advice, consultation, planning, architectural design, drawings and specifications; general administration of the contract as the owner’s representative during the construction phase, wherein expert knowledge and skill are required in connection with the erection, enlargement or alteration of any building or buildings, or the equipment, or utilities thereof, or the accessories thereto, wherein the safeguarding of life, health or property is concerned or involved;

“Architect” means anyone licensed to practice architecture under this act;

“Practice of landscape architecture” means rendering or offering to render service to clients generally, including any one or any combination of the following practices or professional services; advice, consultation, planning, landscape architectural design, drawings and specifications; general administration of the contract as the owner’s representative during the construction phase, wherein expert knowledge and skill are required in connection with landscape enhancement or landscape development, including the formulation of graphic or written criteria to govern the planning or design of land construction projects, production of overall site plans, landscape grading and landscape drainage plans, planting plans, irrigation plans, and construction details wherein in the safeguarding of life, health or property is concerned;

“Landscape architect” means anyone licensed to practice landscape architecture under this act;

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of architects and landscape architects;

“This act” means W.S.

33-4-101

through

33-4-117

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-24; Laws 1971, ch. 139, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-4-102.
Board of architects and landscape architects; created; composition; qualifications of members.

There is hereby created and established a board to be known as the Wyoming state board of architects and landscape architects, which shall be composed of three (3) practicing architects, one (1) practicing landscape architect and one (1) member of the public of integrity and ability, who shall be residents of the state of Wyoming. The architects and landscape architect shall have practiced architecture or landscape architecture continuously in the state of Wyoming for a period of at least five (5) years prior to their appointment.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-25; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

§ 33-4-103.
Board of architects and landscape architects; appointment and term of members; vacancies; removal.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board of architects and landscape architects as provided in W.S.

33-4-102

. Each member shall serve a term of three (3) years or until his successor has been appointed. The governor shall fill all vacancies occurring in the board. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-26; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

§ 33-4-104.
Board of architects and landscape architects; meetings and officers; powers and duties.

The board shall elect a president, vice-president, and secretary-treasurer. The board shall hold regular meetings at least once each year, with the date and place to be set by the board. The board may meet as designated by a majority of the board. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board shall have authority to administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses and take testimony as to matters coming within the scope of its duties. The board shall have the authority to enter into interstate or intrastate agreements and associations with other boards of licensure for the purpose of establishing reciprocity, developing examinations, evaluating applicants or other activities to enhance the services of the board to the state, the licensee and the public. The board shall adopt a seal to be affixed to all licenses issued and shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The board shall establish minimum educational requirements which shall be without prejudice, partiality or discrimination. The board may appoint or contract an executive secretary and other individuals deemed necessary to administer the affairs of the board and shall furnish necessary support and clerical services. Costs related to these services shall be paid from the account as provided in W.S.

33-4-109

. The secretary of the board shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board, which shall at all times be open to public inspection.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in accordance with W.S.

16-4-403

, except that the board may hold executive sessions as provided by W.S.

16-4-405

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-27; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “account” for “earmarked revenue fund” in the next to last sentence.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-4-105.
Application for examination; qualifications.

Any person wishing to practice architecture or landscape architecture in this state who is not a licensed architect or landscape architect shall make application for examination as prescribed by the board.

Each applicant shall:

Be an adult;

Have a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness, integrity and competence in the practice of architecture or landscape architecture;

Hold a professional degree in architecture or landscape architecture from an accredited school of architecture or landscape architecture with practical experience, as the board deems appropriate.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

Any person currently practicing landscape architecture in this state who holds a degree from an accredited school of landscape architecture and has at least five (5) years experience as a landscape architect prior to July 1, 1991 shall be exempt from taking the examination and shall be awarded a license to practice landscape architecture after meeting the other requirements of this act.

The board shall provide by rules and regulations requirements for practical experience.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-28; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 3; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (c), which read: “Until July 1, 1992 the board may license a person without a professional degree from an accredited school of architecture or landscape architecture, who has successfully completed the examination and who has the practical experience required by the board.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (d), see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-106.
Issuance of license; reexamination.

If the applicant is qualified, the board shall issue his license to practice architecture or landscape architecture. Any applicant who fails to pass an examination may be reexamined in the subjects which he failed at the next regularly scheduled examination date, upon the payment of an additional examination fee.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-29; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 4; 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

§ 33-4-107.
License fee and renewal fee set by board; notice of expiration; failure to renew.

Persons practicing architecture or landscape architecture within this state shall pay initial and renewal license fees as set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. Initial licenses shall expire on the thirty-first day of December of the year following the date of issuance. A renewal license shall be issued by the board upon application and payment of the renewal fee, and shall be for a two (2) year period. Application for renewal shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the board of compliance with this act and participation in continuing education activities as established by rules and regulations of the board, provided that requirements for renewal shall be no more stringent than the requirements recommended by the national council of architectural registration boards or the council of landscape architectural registration boards. The board may waive the continuing education requirement for the first renewal of a license. The secretary of the board shall notify each registrant by mail at his last known address at least two (2) months prior to the date of the expiration of his license. Failure of a licensee to secure renewal of his license prior to the date of its expiration shall forfeit his license to practice architecture within the state, provided, however, that the secretary of the board shall again notify the registrant by certified mail at his last known address at least two (2) weeks before the expiration date. Any licensee on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, or who shall establish his residence elsewhere, upon returning to the state may apply for a renewal if the license was not revoked for any cause.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 7; 1957, ch. 252, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-30; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 5; 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 1997, ch. 39, § 1; 1998, ch. 34, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-108.
Licensing decisions of board.

Except as provided in W.S. 33-4-115(c), all decisions of the board involving the granting, denial, renewal, revocation, suspension or withdrawal of a license shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 33-31; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 6; 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12 W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Quoted

in

Butts v. Wyoming State Bd. of Architects, 911 P.2d 1062,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 33-4-109.
Disposition of money collected; compensation for members of board.

All money shall be received and deposited to a separate account and payments made according to regulations established by the department of administration and information. The members of the board shall receive per diem and mileage allowance as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), for each official board meeting. The total expense for every purpose incurred by the board shall not exceed the total of revenue collected.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 10; 1957, ch. 252, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-32; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 7; 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “the earmarked revenue fund” in the first sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “W.S.

9-3-102

” in the second sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-4-110.
Interstate reciprocity.

Persons licensed to practice architecture or landscape architecture under the laws of any other state having requirements substantially equal to those provided for in this act may, in the discretion of the board, be issued a license to practice in this state without examination upon payment of the license fees as herein provided.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 33-33; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-111.
Persons not required to comply with provisions.

All officers and employees of the United States government while engaged in governmental work in this state shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this act. Landscape architecture as applied in this act shall not restrict the practice of architecture, or engineering; nor shall it restrict the customary services normally rendered by landscape nurseries and landscape contractors.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-34; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both sentences, see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-112.
Persons required to qualify or register as “architect”; exceptions.

All persons shall register as an architect in order to make architectural plans and specifications for buildings except those buildings which are specifically exempted in W.S.

33-4-117

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 33-35; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 8; 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

§ 33-4-113.
Use of title “architect” or “landscape architect”.

No person shall use the title “architect” or any title, sign, card or device to indicate that the person is practicing architecture or is an architect unless the person is licensed as an architect under the provisions of this act. No person shall use the title “landscape architect” or any title, sign, or card to indicate such person is practicing landscape architecture, unless the person is licensed as a landscape architect under the provisions of this act. Nothing in this act shall be construed to permit a person licensed as a landscape architect to use the title “architect” or to practice architecture.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-36; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-114.
Prohibited acts; penalty for violations.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to:

Sell, fraudulently obtain or furnish any license or renewal license to practice architecture or landscape architecture; or

Without being licensed under this act:

Advertise, represent or in any manner hold himself out as an architect or landscape architect;

Engage in the practice of architecture or landscape architecture;

Use in connection with his business or name, or otherwise assume, use or advertise any title or description, or engage in any other conduct which reasonably might be expected to mislead another to believe the person is an architect or landscape architect; or

Without being an officer of the corporation, to engage in the practice of architecture or landscape architecture as a corporation.

A person convicted under subsection (a) of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The board may, through the attorney general, seek to enjoin any person from committing any act in violation of this section. The board shall not be required to prove irreparable injury to enjoin any violation of this section.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 33-37; Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a)(ii), see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

§ 33-4-115.
Grounds for refusal, suspension or revocation of license; notice; hearing; counsel at hearing.

The board may take disciplinary actions, singularly or in combination, against a licensee upon a finding of:

Fraud, deceit or material misstatement of fact in applying for a license or in passage of the examination provided for in this act;

Untrustworthiness, incompetency or misconduct in the practice of architecture as evidenced by conduct which endangers life, health, property or the public welfare;

Mental incompetency;

Fraud or deceit in the practice of architecture or landscape architecture;

Affixing, or permitting to be affixed, a seal upon a document which the architect or landscape architect was not responsible for preparing;

Violating this act or a rule or regulation of the board promulgated pursuant to this act;

Suspension or revocation of licensure by another state; or

Conviction under W.S.

33-4-114

, or conviction in another state of any crime which would constitute a violation of W.S.

33-4-114

had the actions been taken in this state. A copy of the judgment of conviction certified by the rendering court shall be presumptive evidence of the conviction in any hearing under this section. For purposes of this paragraph “conviction” includes a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, before refusing to issue a license, suspending or revoking a license for any reason set forth in this section the board shall notify the person as required in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If the applicant or licensee requests a hearing before the board, the board shall hold a hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 97, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-38; Laws 1971, ch. 139, § 9; 1991, ch. 260, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(i) and twice in subsection (a)(vi), see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

Severability. —

Section 16, ch. 97, Laws 1951, reads: “Should any provision or section of this act be held to be invalid for any reason, such holding shall not be construed as affecting the validity of any remaining portion of such section of the act, it being the legislative intent that this act shall stand, notwithstanding the invalidity of any provision or section.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 17, ch. 97, Laws 1951, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

Reciprocal suspension does not violate due process. —

Due process rights are not violated when the board considers a sister state's revocation or suspension of an architect's license so long as the board meets the requirements of notice and a hearing. Butts v. Wyoming State Bd. of Architects, 911 P.2d 1062,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1996).

Reciprocal suspension upheld. —

Subsection (a)(vii) providing for reciprocal suspension or revocation of an architect license is not ambiguous; the terms are not vague or subject to different interpretations. Also, nothing in the statute requires the board to prove the underlying basis for the other state's action against the architect. Butts v. Wyoming State Bd. of Architects, 911 P.2d 1062,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1996).

Disciplinary action presumed correct. —

The legislature has vested the board with the responsibility of taking disciplinary action against those who violate this section, and, absent a showing that the board's actions violated §

16-3-114

, a reviewing court will defer to the findings and expertise of the board in determining appropriate disciplinary action. The actions of the board are presumed to be correct. Butts v. Wyoming State Bd. of Architects, 911 P.2d 1062,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 33-4-116.
Documents, plans and designs; seal required.

An architect or landscape architect shall affix his seal to all documents, plans or designs he provides.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 1.

§ 33-4-117.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this act prohibits any person from preparing plans and specifications, designing, planning or administering the construction contracts for the construction, alteration, remodeling or repair of any of the following:

Private residences;

Garages, commercial or industrial buildings, office buildings, preengineered metal buildings and buildings for the marketing, storage or processing of farm products and warehouses, which do not exceed two (2) stories in height, exclusive of a one (1) story basement, and which under applicable building code or codes, are not designed for occupancy by more than ten (10) persons;

Farm buildings;

Nonstructural alterations of any nature to any building if the alterations do not affect the safety of the occupants of the building.

Nothing in this act shall be construed:

As curtailing or extending the rights of any other legally recognized profession;

As prohibiting the practice of architecture by any legally qualified architect of this state or another state who is employed by the United States government while in the discharge of his official duties;

To prevent the independent employment of a registered professional engineer for any professional service related solely to civil, structural, mechanical or electrical engineering in connection with any building or building project.

This act in no way supersedes, overrides or amends the provisions of chapter 29 of this title regarding registration of professional engineers and professional land surveyors.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 260, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “ten” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsections (a) and (b) and in subsection (c), see § 33-4-101(a)(vii).

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”